Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 9 TLSB 6751YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2435 Section 1. Section 256.9, subsection 68, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 68. Develop and distribute to school districts and charter 3 schools model policies that, if adopted by a school district or 4 charter school, would satisfy the school districtâs or charter 5 schoolâs responsibilities under section 279.65A relating to 6 the discipline of a student for making a threat of violence 7 or causing an incident of violence that results in injury or 8 property damage or assault causing a violent or nonviolent 9 disruption . 10 Sec. 2. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph m, Code 11 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 m. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of 13 section 279.65A relating to the adoption of policies related 14 to the discipline of a student for making a threat of violence 15 or causing an incident of violence that results in injury or 16 property damage or assault who causes a violent or nonviolent 17 disruption in the same manner as a school district. 18 Sec. 3. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 19 by adding the following new paragraph: 20 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0s. Be subject to and comply with the 21 requirements of section 279.89 relating to retaining certain 22 specified students in kindergarten in the same manner as a 23 school district. 24 Sec. 4. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 25 by adding the following new paragraphs: 26 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0l. Be subject to and comply with the 27 requirements of section 279.65A relating to the adoption of 28 policies related to the discipline of a student who causes a 29 violent or nonviolent disruption in the same manner as a school 30 district. 31 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0q. Be subject to and comply with the 32 requirements of section 279.89 relating to retaining certain 33 specified students in kindergarten in the same manner as a 34 school district. 35 -1- LSB 6751YH (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 9 H.F. 2435 Sec. 5. Section 279.65A, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 279.65A Discipline of students who make threats of violence 3 or cause incidents of violence cause violent or nonviolent 4 disruptions ââ teacher authority . 5 1. The board of directors of each school district shall 6 adopt, in collaboration with teachers and administrative staff 7 employed by the school district, policies for different grade 8 levels that describe how a school district may discipline a 9 student for making a threat of violence or causing an incident 10 of violence that results in injury or property damage or 11 assault causing a violent disruption or nonviolent disruption . 12 All of the following shall apply to the policies: 13 1. a. The policies must incorporate strategies that are 14 designed to correct the studentâs behavior. 15 2. b. The policies must provide for parent or guardian 16 conferences, counseling sessions, or mental health counseling 17 sessions, when appropriate. The policies must provide that 18 the school district must receive the prior written consent of 19 the studentâs parent or guardian before requiring the student 20 to participate in a counseling session or a mental health 21 counseling session. 22 3. c. The policies must be consistent with the all of the 23 following: 24 (1) The provisions of chapter 256B , and the administrative 25 rules adopted by the state board for purposes of chapter 256B , 26 the federal . 27 (2) The federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 28 Act, 20 U.S.C. Â§1400 et seq. , and the federal . 29 (3) The federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended and 30 codified in 29 U.S.C. Â§701 et seq. 31 (4) The federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 32 20 U.S.C. Â§1232g et seq. 33 (5) The federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 34 U.S.C. Â§12101 et seq. 35 -2- LSB 6751YH (3) 91 jda/jh 2/ 9 H.F. 2435 4. d. The policies must provide for escalating levels of 1 discipline each time the student makes a threat of violence 2 or causes an incident of violence that results in injury or 3 property damage or assault causes a violent disruption or 4 nonviolent disruption . 5 5. e. The policies must allow for the school district 6 to select the level of discipline that the school district 7 determines corresponds to the severity of the threat of 8 violence or incident of violence violent disruption or 9 nonviolent disruption . 10 6. f. The policies must allow the school district to 11 suspend the student, permanently remove the student from a 12 particular class, expel the student, or place the student in 13 an alternative learning environment, including a therapeutic 14 classroom, when appropriate. 15 7. g. The policies must require an individualized education 16 program meeting if the student who made the threat of violence 17 or caused the incident of violence that resulted in injury 18 or property damage or assault caused a violent disruption or 19 nonviolent disruption, or who was removed from the classroom 20 pursuant to this subsection, has an individualized education 21 program. 22 h. (1) The policies must require each attendance center 23 within the school district to create a placement review 24 committee that is responsible for determining when a student 25 who was removed from a classroom pursuant to paragraph âiâ or 26 âjâ may return to the classroom. 27 (2) The placement review committee must consist of all of 28 the following members: 29 (a) Two teachers who work in the attendance center and who 30 must be selected by the teachers of the attendance center. 31 (b) One professional staff member who works in the 32 attendance center and who must be selected by the principal of 33 the attendance center. 34 i. (1) (a) The policies must authorize a teacher to remove 35 -3- LSB 6751YH (3) 91 jda/jh 3/ 9 H.F. 2435 a student who causes a nonviolent disruption from the teacherâs 1 classroom and place the student under the supervision of the 2 principal of the attendance center in which the classroom is 3 located, or the principalâs designee, for at least thirty 4 minutes, as determined by the principal or the principalâs 5 designee in accordance with the policies. 6 (b) The policies must prohibit the principal, or the 7 principalâs designee, from returning a student who is removed 8 from the classroom pursuant to subparagraph division (a) to 9 the teacherâs classroom without the teacherâs consent, unless 10 the placement review committee determines that the student 11 should be returned to the classroom pursuant to paragraph âhâ , 12 subparagraph (1). 13 (c) The policies must require the principal, or the 14 principalâs designee, to inform the teacher of the disciplinary 15 actions taken against the student removed from the classroom 16 pursuant to subparagraph division (a) as soon as is reasonably 17 possible after the studentâs removal. 18 (d) The policies must require a student who is removed from 19 the classroom pursuant to subparagraph division (a) to make up 20 any work that the student missed while the student was under 21 the supervision of the principal or the principalâs designee. 22 (2) The policies must require that, if a student is 23 removed from a teacherâs classroom pursuant to subparagraph 24 (1), subparagraph division (a), more than once in one school 25 year, the teacher or teachers who removed the student from the 26 classroom; the principal of the attendance center in which 27 the classroom or classrooms are located; a qualified guidance 28 counselor licensed by the board of educational examiners under 29 chapter 256, subchapter VII, part 3; the studentâs parent or 30 legal guardian, if the student is not an emancipated minor; 31 and the student shall participate in a meeting to discuss the 32 studentâs nonviolent disruptions and to establish a behavioral 33 plan and a course of discipline to correct the studentâs 34 behavior, which may include placement in an alternative 35 -4- LSB 6751YH (3) 91 jda/jh 4/ 9 H.F. 2435 learning environment, including a therapeutic classroom, when 1 appropriate. 2 j. (1) The policies must require a teacher to remove a 3 student who causes a violent disruption from the teacherâs 4 classroom and place the student under the supervision of the 5 principal of the attendance center in which the classroom is 6 located, or the principalâs designee. 7 (2) (a) The policies must prohibit the principal, or 8 the principalâs designee, from returning a student who is 9 removed from the classroom pursuant to subparagraph (1) to 10 the teacherâs classroom without the teacherâs consent, unless 11 the placement review committee determines that the student 12 should be returned to the classroom pursuant to paragraph âhâ , 13 subparagraph (1). 14 (b) Notwithstanding paragraph âhâ , subparagraph (1), and 15 subparagraph division (a), the policies must provide that the 16 placement review committee shall not have the authority to 17 require a student to return to a teacherâs classroom if all of 18 the following criteria are satisfied: 19 (i) The teacher removed the student from the teacherâs 20 classroom because the student caused a violent disruption that 21 included the student assaulting the teacher. 22 (ii) The teacher does not consent to allowing the student to 23 return to the teacherâs classroom. 24 (3) The policies must require that a student removed 25 from the classroom pursuant to this paragraph be suspended, 26 expelled, or placed in an alternative learning environment, 27 including a therapeutic classroom, when appropriate, as 28 determined by the principal of the attendance center in which 29 the classroom is located in accordance with the policies. 30 8. k. The policies must be published on the school 31 districtâs internet site and in applicable student handbooks. 32 2. For purposes of this section: 33 a. âNonviolent disruptionâ includes but is not limited to a 34 disruption to classroom instruction that is a result of any of 35 -5- LSB 6751YH (3) 91 jda/jh 5/ 9 H.F. 2435 the following: 1 (1) Disorderly conduct. 2 (2) Abusive or profane language. 3 (3) Bullying, as defined under section 280.28. 4 (4) Repeatedly disruptive behavior. 5 b. âViolent disruptionâ includes but is not limited to 6 a disruption to classroom instruction that is a result of a 7 threat of violence or an incident of violence that results in 8 any of the following: 9 (1) Injury. 10 (2) Property damage. 11 (3) Assault, as defined under section 708.1. 12 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Retention of certain students 13 in kindergarten. 14 The board of directors of a school district shall not promote 15 a student enrolled in kindergarten to the next grade level if 16 the student fails to achieve proficient scores on standardized, 17 norm-referenced assessments administered near the end of the 18 school year. 19 Sec. 7. Section 299.1A, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 20 to read as follows: 21 2. A child who has reached the age of five by September 22 15 July 1 and who is enrolled in a school district shall be 23 considered to be of compulsory attendance age unless the 24 parent or guardian of the child notifies the school district 25 in writing of the parentâs or guardianâs intent to remove the 26 child from enrollment in the school district. 27